District of Columbia statutes.
34-2409.04

Levy upon discontinuance of water service.

Whenever water is discontinued from any building or premises into which it has been introduced, such building shall be subject to the fireplug tax from the date of the discontinuance of the water.

R.S., D.C., § 208
1981 Ed., § 43-1537.
1973 Ed., § 43-1528.